Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.731, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Prohibited use. (a) No person shall knowingly, or with reason to know, use tear gas, a tear gas compound, an authorized tear gas compound, or an electronic incapacitation device on or against a peace officer who is in the performance of duties. (b) No person shall use tear gas, a tear gas compound, an authorized tear gas compound, or an electronic incapacitation device except as authorized in subdivision 2 or 6. (c) Tear gas, a tear gas compound, or an electronic incapacitation device shall legally constitute a weapon when it is used in the commission of a crime. (d) No person shall use tear gas or a tear gas compound in an immobilizing concentration against another person, except as otherwise permitted by subdivision 2. new text begin (e) No peace officer shall use tear gas in the performance of the officer's duties. No law enforcement agency shall supply tear gas to, or authorize the use of tear gas by, peace officers employed by the agency. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.731, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Exceptions. new text begin (a) new text end Nothing in this section deleted text begin shall prohibitdeleted text end new text begin prohibitsnew text end the possession deleted text begin or use of by, or the sale ordeleted text end new text begin , use, sale, ornew text end furnishing ofdeleted text begin ,deleted text end tear gasdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ornew text end a tear gas compounddeleted text begin , an authorized tear gas compound, or electronic incapacitation device to, a law enforcement agency, peace officer,deleted text end new text begin tonew text end the National Guard or reserves, or a member of the National Guard or reserves for use in their official duties, except that counties and municipalities may impose licensing requirements on sellers pursuant to subdivision 9. new text begin (b) Nothing in this section prohibits the possession, use, sale, or furnishing of an electronic incapacitation device to a law enforcement agency, a peace officer, the National Guard or reserves, or a member of the National Guard or reserves for use in their official duties, except that counties and municipalities may impose licensing requirements on sellers pursuant to subdivision 9. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [626.8438] CHEMICAL WEAPONS AND KINETIC ENERGY MUNITIONS PROHIBITED; POLICIES REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Chemical weapons" means: new text end new text begin (1) toxic chemicals and precursors of toxic chemicals, except when intended for purposes not prohibited pursuant to this subdivision and when the types and quantities of such chemicals are consistent with such purposes; new text end new text begin (2) munitions and devices specifically designed to cause death or other harm through toxic properties of toxic chemicals as described in clause (1) that would be released as a result of the employment of such munitions and devices; or new text end new text begin (3) any equipment specifically designed for use directly in connection with the employment of munitions and devices as described in clause (2). new text end new text begin (c) "Toxic chemical" means any chemical that through its chemical action on life processes can cause death, temporary incapacitation, or permanent harm to humans or animals. Toxic chemicals include all chemicals defined as toxic chemicals pursuant to this paragraph, regardless of the origin or method of production of the chemical and regardless of whether the chemicals are produced in facilities, in munitions, or elsewhere. new text end new text begin (d) "Kinetic energy munitions" includes but is not limited to impact rounds, including rubber baton rounds, and plastic, wax, wood, or rubber-coated projectiles. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin Law enforcement agencies and peace officers are prohibited from using chemical weapons and kinetic energy munitions on civilian populations. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Model policy required. new text end new text begin By November 15, 2026, the board must develop a model policy for law enforcement agencies to implement the prohibition on law enforcement agencies and peace officers from using chemical weapons and kinetic energy munitions on civilian populations. The board must distribute the model policy to all chief law enforcement officers. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Agency policies required. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the chief law enforcement officer of every state and local law enforcement agency must establish and enforce a written policy that is identical or substantially similar to the board's model policy described in subdivision 3. new text end